trunk/incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="mošk/i__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ega</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="let/ev__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="razlog__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="blagajn/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="upravičen/ec__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ec</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cu</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cu</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cem</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cev</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cem</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vos/ek__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kov</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kih</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stoletj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jajc/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jekl/o__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kriz/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="roj__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kos/ec__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="premogovništvo"><i>premogovništv</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="blagajna"><i>blagajn</i><par n="blagajn/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="faraon"><i>faraon</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mučenik"><i>mučenik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pigment"><i>pigment</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zgostitev"><i>zgostit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dežnik"><i>dežnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hranitev"><i>hranit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="diabetik"><i>diabetik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="načrtovalec"><i>načrtoval</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prestopnik"><i>prestopnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dobitnik"><i>dobitnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kadilec"><i>kadil</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sinonim"><i>sinonim</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="parazit"><i>parazit</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="podjetništvo"><i>podjetništv</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="roj"><i>roj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bralec"><i>bral</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kriza"><i>kriz</i><par n="kriz/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jeklo"><i>jekl</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="odmev"><i>odmev</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kirurg"><i>kirurg</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rdečilo"><i>rdečil</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="naraščanje"><i>naraščanj</i><par n="stoletj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="svečenik"><i>svečenik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klin"><i>klin</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="povečanje"><i>povečanj</i><par n="stoletj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="moški"><i>mošk</i><par n="mošk/i__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gradbenik"><i>gradbenik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pretepač"><i>pretepač</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zmanjševanje"><i>zmanjševanj</i><par n="stoletj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fenol"><i>fenol</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prapor"><i>prapor</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="omilitev"><i>omilit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bančništvo"><i>bančništv</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="varčevalec"><i>varčeval</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mladenič"><i>mladenič</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="izseljenec"><i>izseljen</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="reagent"><i>reagent</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zajezitev"><i>zajezit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="programiranje"><i>programiranj</i><par n="stoletj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="blato"><i>blat</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="perilo"><i>peril</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vosek"><i>vos</i><par n="vos/ek__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kosec"><i>kos</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tabor"><i>tabor</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="letev"><i>let</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="poganjanje"><i>poganjanj</i><par n="stoletj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="nacist"><i>nacist</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="razvedrilo"><i>razvedril</i><par n="jekl/o__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="prireditelj"><i>prireditelj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gostitev"><i>gostit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="analogija"><i>analogij</i><par n="blagajn/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="razlog"><i>razlog</i><par n="razlog__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="biskvit"><i>biskvit</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="povpraševanje"><i>povpraševanj</i><par n="stoletj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lestev"><i>lest</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="preureditev"><i>preuredit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nožič"><i>nožič</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zaviralec"><i>zaviral</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="razsvetlitev"><i>razsvetlit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="plug"><i>plug</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="poraženec"><i>poražen</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="čep"><i>čep</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pašnik"><i>pašnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="upravičenec"><i>upravičen</i><par n="upravičen/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="jajce"><i>jajc</i><par n="jajc/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="razmestitev"><i>razmestit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stoletje"><i>stoletj</i><par n="stoletj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zaostritev"><i>zaostrit</i><par n="let/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ustanovitelj"><i>ustanovitelj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="golosek"><i>golosek</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
